Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8469. VENABLE RANCH MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT NO. 1 OF DENTON COUNTY

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8469.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "City" means the City of Aubrey, Texas.

(3) "Commission" means the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality.

(4) "Director" means a board member.

(5) "District" means the Venable Ranch Municipal Utility District No. 1 of Denton County.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 8469.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a municipal utility district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 8469.003. CONFIRMATION AND DIRECTORS' ELECTION REQUIRED. The temporary directors shall hold an election to confirm the creation of the district and to elect five permanent directors as provided by Section 49.102, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 8469.004. CONSENT OF CITY REQUIRED. The temporary directors may not hold an election under Section 8469.003 until:

(1) the city has consented by ordinance or resolution to the creation of the district and to the inclusion of land in the district; and

(2) the city and an owner or owners of land in the district have entered into a development agreement under Section 212.172, Local Government Code.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 8469.005. FINDINGS OF PUBLIC PURPOSE AND BENEFIT. (a) The district is created to serve a public purpose and benefit.

(b) The district is created to accomplish the purposes of:

(1) a municipal utility district as provided by general law and Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution; and

(2) Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, that relate to the construction, acquisition, improvement, operation, or maintenance of macadamized, graveled, or paved roads, or improvements, including storm drainage, in aid of those roads.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 8469.006. INITIAL DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is initially composed of the territory described by Section 2, Chapter 1244, and Section 6, Chapter 1308, Acts of the 83rd Legislature, Regular Session, 2013.

(b) The boundaries and field notes contained in Section 2, Chapter 1244, and Section 6, Chapter 1308, Acts of the 83rd Legislature, Regular Session, 2013, form a closure. A mistake made in the field notes or in copying the field notes in the legislative process does not affect the district's:

(1) organization, existence, or validity;

(2) right to issue any type of bond for the purposes for which the district is created or to pay the principal of and interest on a bond;

(3) right to impose a tax; or

(4) legality or operation.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 15.003(a), eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8469.051. GOVERNING BODY; TERMS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five elected directors.

(b) Except as provided by Section 8469.052, directors serve staggered four-year terms.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 8469.052. TEMPORARY DIRECTORS. (a) On or after September 1, 2013, the owner or owners of a majority of the assessed value of the real property in the district may submit a petition to the commission requesting that the commission appoint as temporary directors the five persons named in the petition. The commission shall appoint as temporary directors the five persons named in the petition.

(b) Temporary directors serve until the earlier of:

(1) the date permanent directors are elected under Section 8469.003; or

(2) September 1, 2017.

(c) If permanent directors have not been elected under Section 8469.003 and the terms of the temporary directors have expired, successor temporary directors shall be appointed or reappointed as provided by Subsection (d) to serve terms that expire on the earlier of:

(1) the date permanent directors are elected under Section 8469.003; or

(2) the fourth anniversary of the date of the appointment or reappointment.

(d) If Subsection (c) applies, the owner or owners of a majority of the assessed value of the real property in the district may submit a petition to the commission requesting that the commission appoint as successor temporary directors the five persons named in the petition. The commission shall appoint as successor temporary directors the five persons named in the petition.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8469.101. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the powers and duties necessary to accomplish the purposes for which the district is created.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 8469.102. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the powers and duties provided by the general law of this state, including Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, applicable to municipal utility districts created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 8469.103. AUTHORITY FOR ROAD PROJECTS. Under Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, the district may design, acquire, construct, finance, issue bonds for, improve, operate, maintain, and convey to this state, a county, or a municipality for operation and maintenance macadamized, graveled, or paved roads, or improvements, including storm drainage, in aid of those roads.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 8469.104. ROAD STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS. (a) A road project must meet all applicable construction standards, zoning and subdivision requirements, and regulations of each municipality in whose corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction the road project is located.

(b) If a road project is not located in the corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality, the road project must meet all applicable construction standards, subdivision requirements, and regulations of each county in which the road project is located.

(c) If the state will maintain and operate the road, the Texas Transportation Commission must approve the plans and specifications of the road project.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 8469.105. COMPLIANCE WITH MUNICIPAL CONSENT ORDINANCE OR RESOLUTION. The district shall comply with all applicable requirements of any ordinance or resolution that is adopted under Section 54.016 or 54.0165, Water Code, and that consents to the creation of the district or to the inclusion of land in the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 8469.106. DIVISION OF DISTRICT. (a) The district may be divided into two or more new districts only if the district:

(1) has no outstanding bonded debt; and

(2) is not imposing ad valorem taxes.

(b) This chapter applies to any new district created by the division of the district, and a new district has all the powers and duties of the district.

(c) Any new district created by the division of the district may not, at the time the new district is created, contain any land outside the area described by Section 2, Chapter 1244, and Section 6, Chapter 1308, Acts of the 83rd Legislature, Regular Session, 2013.

(d) The board, on its own motion or on receipt of a petition signed by the owner or owners of a majority of the assessed value of the real property in the district, may adopt an order dividing the district.

(e) The board may adopt an order dividing the district before or after the date the board holds an election under Section 8469.151 to authorize the issuance of bonds.

(f) An order dividing the district must:

(1) name each new district;

(2) include the metes and bounds description of the territory of each new district;

(3) appoint temporary directors for each new district; and

(4) provide for the division of assets and liabilities between or among the new districts.

(g) On or before the 30th day after the date of adoption of an order dividing the district, the district shall file the order with the commission and record the order in the real property records of each county in which the district is located.

(h) Any new district created by the division of the district shall hold a confirmation and directors' election as required by Section 8469.003.

(i) Any new district created by the division of the district must hold an election as required by this chapter to obtain voter approval before the district may impose a maintenance tax or issue bonds payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes.

(j) If the creation of the new district is confirmed, the new district shall provide the election date and results to the commission.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 15.004(a), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 15.004(b), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 8469.107. FIREFIGHTING SERVICES. Notwithstanding Section 49.351(a), Water Code, the district may, as authorized by Section 59(f), Article XVI, Texas Constitution, and Section 49.351, Water Code:

(1) establish, operate, and maintain a fire department;

(2) contract with another political subdivision for the joint operation of a fire department; or

(3) contract with any other person to perform firefighting services in the district and may issue bonds and impose taxes to pay for the department and the activities.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 8469.108. FEES AND CHARGES. (a) The district may adopt and enforce all necessary charges, mandatory fees, or rentals, in addition to taxes, for providing or making available any district facility or service, including firefighting activities provided under Section 8469.107.

(b) To enforce payment of an unpaid fee or charge due to the district, on the request of the district, a retail public utility, as defined by Section 13.002, Water Code, providing water or sewer service to a customer in the district shall terminate the service.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER D. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8469.151. ELECTIONS REGARDING TAXES OR BONDS. (a) The district may issue, without an election, bonds and other obligations secured by:

(1) revenue other than ad valorem taxes; or

(2) contract payments described by Section 8469.153.

(b) The district must hold an election in the manner provided by Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, to obtain voter approval before the district may impose an ad valorem tax or issue bonds payable from ad valorem taxes.

(c) The district may not issue bonds payable from ad valorem taxes to finance a road project unless the issuance is approved by a vote of a two-thirds majority of the district voters voting at an election held for that purpose.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 8469.152. OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE TAX. (a) If authorized at an election held under Section 8469.151, the district may impose an operation and maintenance tax on taxable property in the district in accordance with Section 49.107, Water Code.

(b) The board shall determine the tax rate. The rate may not exceed the rate approved at the election.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 8469.153. CONTRACT TAXES. (a) In accordance with Section 49.108, Water Code, the district may impose a tax other than an operation and maintenance tax and use the revenue derived from the tax to make payments under a contract after the provisions of the contract have been approved by a majority of the district voters voting at an election held for that purpose.

(b) A contract approved by the district voters may contain a provision stating that the contract may be modified or amended by the board without further voter approval.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER E. BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS

Sec. 8469.201. AUTHORITY TO ISSUE BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. The district may issue bonds or other obligations payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes, impact fees, revenue, contract payments, grants, or other district money, or any combination of those sources, to pay for any authorized district purpose.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 8469.202. TAXES FOR BONDS. At the time the district issues bonds payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes, the board shall provide for the annual imposition of a continuing direct ad valorem tax, without limit as to rate or amount, while all or part of the bonds are outstanding as required and in the manner provided by Sections 54.601 and 54.602, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 8469.203. BONDS FOR ROAD PROJECTS. At the time of issuance, the total principal amount of bonds or other obligations issued or incurred to finance road projects and payable from ad valorem taxes may not exceed one-fourth of the assessed value of the real property in the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER F. ANNEXATION BY CITY

Sec. 8469.251. EFFECT OF ANNEXATION BY CITY. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, if all of the territory of the district or a district created by the division of the district is annexed by the city into the corporate limits of the city, the district may not be dissolved and continues in existence following annexation until:

(1) water, sanitary sewer, and drainage improvements and roads have been constructed to serve at least 90 percent of the territory of the district capable of development; or

(2) the board adopts a resolution consenting to the dissolution of the district.

(b) After annexation by the city:

(1) the district may impose a special assessment in the manner provided by Subchapter F, Chapter 375, Local Government Code; and

(2) Section 375.161, Local Government Code, does not apply to the district.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 54.016(f)(2), Water Code, an allocation agreement between the city and the district that provides for the allocation of the taxes or revenues of the district and the city following the date of inclusion of the district's territory in the corporate limits of the city may provide that the total annual ad valorem taxes collected by the city and the district from taxable property within the city's corporate limits may exceed the city's ad valorem tax on that property.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1244 (S.B. 1877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 3914), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 872 (H.B. 3099), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 872, Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 872, Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.